Washington statutes.
RCW 43.250.160

Separately managed state agency investment account.

There is created a trust fund to be known as the separately managed state agency investment account. The account is to be separately accounted for and invested by the state treasurer. All moneys remitted by state agencies for investment in separate portfolios under this chapter shall be deposited in this account. All earnings on any balances in the separately managed state agency investment account, less amounts charged by the office of the state treasurer, shall be credited to the separately managed state agency investment account.

[ 2019 c 163 s 5.]